Vermont, session 2025-2026, S318.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 31 V.S.A. chapter 14, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Casino Gaming
§ 681. CASINO GAMING AUTHORIZED
(a) Casino gaming is authorized to the extent that it is conducted in
accordance with this subchapter.
(b) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this subchapter.
§ 682. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #386105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.318
2026 Page 2 of 7
(1) “Adjusted gross receipts” means the gross receipts less voided
wagers and winnings paid to wagerers.
(2) “Applicant” means any person who applies for a license under
this subchapter.
(3) “Board” means the Board of Liquor and Lottery.
(4) “Casino” means a building in which gaming is conducted.
(5) “Casino enterprise” means the buildings, facilities, or rooms
functionally or physically connected to a casino, including any bar, restaurant,
hotel, cocktail lounge, retail establishment, or any other premises under the
control of a licensee.
(6) “Casino gaming license” means the license that permits the holder to
conduct a gambling operation pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.
(7) “Gambling game” means any game played with cards, dice,
equipment, or a machine, including any mechanical, electromechanical, or
electronic device, which shall include computers and cashless wagering
systems, for money, credit, or any representation of value, including faro,
monte, roulette, keno, bingo, fan-tan, twenty-one, blackjack, seven and a half,
Klondike, craps, poker, chuck-a-luck, wheel of fortune, chemin de fer,
baccarat, pai gow, beat the banker, panguingue, slot machine, any banking or
percentage game, or any other game or device approved by the Board. The
term “gambling game” does not include games played with cards in private
VT LEG #386105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.318
2026 Page 3 of 7
homes or residences in which no person makes money for operating the game
except as a player.
(8) “Gambling operation” means the conduct of authorized gambling
games in a casino.
(9) “Gaming” means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain, or
expose or offer for play any gambling game or gambling operation.
(10) “Gross receipts” means the total of all sums, including valid or
invalid checks, currency, tokens, coupons, vouchers, or instruments of
monetary value, whether collected or due, received by a casino licensee from
gaming, including all entry fees assessed for tournaments or other contests, less
a deduction for uncollectable gaming receivables not to exceed the
uncollectable amounts owed as a result of wagers placed at or through a
gambling game or four percent of the total gross receipts, whichever is less.
The licensee shall not receive the deduction unless the licensee provides
written proof to the State Treasurer of the uncollected gaming receivables and
has complied with all the rules adopted by the Board regarding the issuance of
credit and the collection of amounts due under a credit extension.
(11) “Wagerer” means a person who plays a gambling game authorized
under this subchapter.
VT LEG #386105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.318
2026 Page 4 of 7
(12) “Winnings” means the total cash value of all property or sums,
including currency, tokens, or instruments of monetary value paid to wagerers
as a direct result of wagers placed at or through a gambling game.
§ 683. BOARD OF LIQUOR AND LOTTERY; JURISDICTION; POWERS
The Board shall have jurisdiction over and shall supervise all gambling
operations governed by this subchapter. The Board, through the
Commissioner, shall have all powers necessary and proper to carry out the
provisions of this subchapter, including the power:
(1) to investigate applicants and determine the eligibility of applicants
for licenses;
(2) to supervise casino gambling operations and all persons in casinos or
casino enterprises where gambling operations are conducted;
(3) to inspect and examine all premises where casino gaming occurs;
(4) to inspect, examine, audit, impound, seize, or assume physical
control of all books, ledgers, documents, writings, photocopies, videotapes, or
other records related to casino gambling operations and gaming;
(5) to investigate and deter violations of this subchapter or rules adopted
by the Board;
(6) to hire appropriate administrative staff and investigators as necessary
to carry out and enforce the provisions of this subchapter; and
VT LEG #386105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.318
2026 Page 5 of 7
(7) to suspend, revoke, or restrict licenses for violations of this
subchapter or rules adopted by the Board.
§ 684. CASINO GAMING LICENSE; APPLICATION
(a) A person may apply to the Board for a casino gaming license to conduct
a casino gambling operation as provided in this subchapter. The application
shall be made on oath on forms provided by the Board and shall contain
information as prescribed by the Board.
(b)(1) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may issue up to two casino gaming
licenses to qualified applicants.
(2) The term of each license shall be for five years from the date of issue
and may be renewed for an additional five years.
(3) The license fee shall be $5,000,000.00, which shall be paid to the
Board of Liquor and Lottery either in full upon issuance of the license or in
five annual installments of $1,000,000.00.
(c) A nonrefundable application fee of $100,000.00 shall be paid to the
Board at the time the application is filed.
§ 685. CASINO WAGERING TAX
A wagering tax is imposed on the adjusted gross receipts received annually
by a licensee from gaming authorized under this subchapter at the rate of
10 percent. The Commissioner of Taxes is authorized to collect and administer
the wagering tax under 32 V.S.A. chapter 103, and the tax shall be paid and
VT LEG #386105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.318
2026 Page 6 of 7
collected in the same manner as an income tax under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151. A
licensee liable for the tax imposed by this section shall remit to the
Commissioner of Taxes a return and any other information required by the
Commissioner along with the tax due on or before January 15 of each year.
The Commissioner shall deposit all revenues from the wagering tax in the
Education Fund established in 16 V.S.A. § 4025.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. COMPOSITION OF DEPARTMENT; COMMISSIONER OF
LIQUOR AND LOTTERY; BOARD OF LIQUOR AND LOTTERY
(a)(1) The Department of Liquor and Lottery, created by 3 V.S.A. § 212,
shall administer the laws relating to alcoholic beverages, tobacco, casino
gaming, and the State Lottery. It shall include the Commissioner of Liquor
and Lottery and the Board of Liquor and Lottery.
(2) The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall supervise and manage the
sales of spirits and fortified wines pursuant to this title and the establishment
and management of the State Lottery and casino gaming pursuant to 31 V.S.A.
chapter 14.
(3)(A) The Department of Liquor and Lottery shall be under the
immediate supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Liquor and
Lottery.
* * *
VT LEG #386105 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.318
2026 Page 7 of 7
(C) The Division of Lottery is created within the Department to
administer and carry out the laws relating to the State Lottery and casino
gaming set forth in 31 V.S.A. chapter 14.
* * *
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 138 is amended to read:
§ 138. LOCAL OPTION TAXES
* * *
(b) If the legislative body of a municipality by a majority vote
recommends, the voters of a municipality may, at an annual or special meeting
warned for that purpose, by a majority vote of those present and voting, assess
any or all of the following:
(1) a one percent sales tax;
(2) a one percent meals and alcoholic beverages tax;
(3) a one percent rooms tax; or
(4) a one percent casino gaming tax.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386105 v.1